Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 3. Legislative Department
§ 36. Prohibited appropriations.

No appropriation shall be made for charitable, industrial, educational or benevolent purposes to any person, corporation or community not under the absolute control of the state, nor to any denominational or sectarian institution or association.

Cross references. —

For an equivalent provision, see art. 1, § 19, Wyo. Const.

Appropriation to state penitentiary not prohibited. —

An appropriation to the state penitentiary, though it is a charitable institution, is not prohibited by this section. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Counties are under absolute control of the state

within constitutional provision restricting appropriations to other corporations. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923).

Counties, whether regarded as corporations or as mere political subdivisions, are under the absolute control of the state, within this section. Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

This section had no application with regard to constitutionality of Wyoming Community Development Authority Act,

§

9-18-101

et seq. (now §

9-7-101

et seq.), since the supreme court had held that no appropriated tax funds pledged beyond the current year's taxes of the state could go into a special fund to pay off the bonds of the Wyoming community development authority. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Poverty of recipient. —

The prohibition against donations by the state cannot be nullified by claim recipient was poor. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Appropriation to widow of peace officer killed in line of duty. —

This section is not violated by an appropriation for the benefit of the widow of a peace officer who was killed in the line of duty, since such an appropriation is in recognition of a moral obligation of the state. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

§ 37. Delegation of power to perform municipal functions prohibited.

The legislature shall not delegate to any special commissioner, private corporation or association, any power to make, supervise or interfere with any municipal improvements, moneys, property or effects, whether held in trust or otherwise, to levy taxes, or to perform any municipal functions whatever.

Intent of section. —

The constitutional prohibition against delegation of power is intended to protect against the exercise of the taxing power and other purely municipal functions by officials not subject to the people's control. Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968); Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

The purpose of this section was to prevent the legislature, either directly or indirectly, from taking away municipal powers from municipal authorities and conferring them on some commission in no way connected with the regularly constituted municipal authority, subject to the will of the municipal inhabitants. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Control of municipal functions by elective municipal officers. —

Where performance of municipal functions is controlled by elective municipal officers, this section is not violated. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

No tax can be levied by officers who are appointed and not elected by the people. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

City manager is not “special commissioner.” —

A city manager, under act creating commission manager form of government, is not a “special commissioner” to whom prohibited powers are granted. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

State board of equalization is neither a special commissioner nor a private corporation nor an association

within the meaning of this section. Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

County committee, whose function is to prepare and submit a plan of organization

for a unified school district or unified school districts within the county, is not a “special commissioner” or a “private corporation” or an “association.” Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Status of board of public utilities. —

Under this constitutional provision a board of public utilities is under the general control of the town or city council and it has no other powers except those which are administrative. Town of Worland v. Odell & Johnson, 79 Wyo. 1, 329 P.2d 797,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1958).

Meaning of governmental functions. —

Governmental functions are those conferred or imposed on a municipality as a local agency of limited and prescribed jurisdiction, to be employed in administering the affairs of the state and promoting the public welfare generally. Carter v. Board of County Comm'rs, 518 P.2d 142,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1974).

Legislative power of a purely local nature may be delegated

to political subdivisions created for the purpose of local self-government. Carter v. Board of County Comm'rs, 518 P.2d 142,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1974).

Administrative powers may be delegated. —

Administrative powers, and these only, may be delegated under this section. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Matters which are administrative only may be delegated without violating the constitutional prohibition against the legislature delegating to a special commissioner power to supervise or interfere with any municipal function. Uhls v. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968). See also, Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Statute requiring city to enact ordinances invalid. —

Mandatory provisions requiring governing board of city to enact ordinances deemed necessary by board of public utilities violates constitution and cannot stand under general principle that legislative power cannot be delegated. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Municipal taxing power improperly vested. —

Since taxing power is vested only in mayor and city commission, leaving to their discretion determination in first instance whether affairs of city justify issuance of bonds, provisions of statute vesting such power in another board violate this section. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Irrigation district law was not unconstitutional

as delegating to special commissioner, private corporation or association power to perform municipal functions or levy taxes. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Powers and duties of escrow bank with respect to escrowed municipal funds. —

The provisions of §

16-5-110

, prescribing the powers and duties of the escrow bank with respect to escrowed municipal funds, do not constitute a delegation of power to a private corporation to supervise public moneys, properties, or effects, or otherwise perform municipal functions in contravention of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Industrial Development Projects Act is constitutional.

Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Agency organized by municipalities under Joint Powers Act. —

Agency organized by several municipalities under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

, to provide electrical power and energy to their inhabitants, did not unconstitutionally delegate its power to the electrical transmission system of which it was an owner, as a tenant in common, where under the agreement among the participants in the system, including a private corporation, the private corporation was the project manager during construction of the generation station and transmission lines and after construction would be operating agent of the station and related distribution facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Because the operation of an electric utility is a proprietary and not a governmental function of a city, this section was not applicable and there was no unconstitutional delegation of a municipal function to an agency which was organized by eight municipalities by authority of the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

, to provide electrical power and energy to their inhabitants. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

As long as the municipality and its representatives retain their powers of judgment, discretion and management, there is no objection to an alliance with private enterprise, with the latter performing ministerial and executive functions requiring special skills. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Provisions of Wyoming Community Development Authority Act do not violate section. —

Section 9-18-105 (now §

9-7-105

) and former §§ 9-18-109, 9-18-110 (now repealed) did not violate this section on the ground that they delegated to the Wyoming community development authority the power to interfere with municipal moneys. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

The Wyoming community development authority is a statewide governmental instrumentality, not a political subdivision. It is designed, though having some unconstitutional features, to meet the economic impact upon the entire state and its people. It is patterned to perform a function not within the capabilities of a municipality. It does not interfere with that which is within the powers of a municipality. Such a plan is not within the prohibition of this section. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

The Wyoming community development authority has no power to tax. There is nothing in the act permitting the authority to move into a community and perform any function against the will of the people there residing. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Sections

27-10-101

to

27-10-109

, pertaining to collective bargaining for fire fighters,

do not violate this section.
State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Joint enterprise of county, federal government, constitutional. —

The joint enterprise of a county and the U.S. forest service to condemn a private road to provide access to a national forest for recreation, the harvesting of timber, and the development and operation of oil and gas leases, did not violate either the Wyoming statutes or the Wyoming constitution. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

Fristam v. City of Sheridan, 66 Wyo. 143, 206 P.2d 741,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1949).

Quoted

in

Police Protective Ass'n v. City of Rock Springs, 631 P.2d 433,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1959).

Cited

in

White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1957); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local v. Kingham, 420 P.2d 254,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1966).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Constitutionality of Wyoming's Oil and Gas Compulsory Pooling Provision,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 300.

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

§ 38. Investment of trust funds.

The legislature may authorize the investment of trust funds by executors, administrators, guardians or trustees, in the bonds or stocks of private corporations, and in such other securities as it may by law provide. (As amended by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 519.)

Construction of section. —

This section relates to financial matters running into indefinite future and is strictly construed. In re Durrin's Estate, 61 Wyo. 1, 154 P.2d 348,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1944).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Legal Investment for a Wyoming Trustee,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 130 (1958).

For note, “Common Trust and Mutual Fund as Legal Investments for a Wyoming Trustee,” see 17 Wyo. L.J. 187 (1963).

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

§ 39. Aid to railroads prohibited.

The legislature shall have no power to pass any law authorizing the state or any county in the state to contract any debt or obligation in the construction of any railroad, or give or loan its credit to or in aid of the construction of the same.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning railroads, see art. 10, §§ 11 to 19, Wyo. Const., and §§

37-9-101

to

37-9-1002

.

§ 40. Debts to state or municipal corporation cannot be released unless otherwise prescribed by legislature.

No obligation or liability of any person, association or corporation held or owned by the state or any municipal corporation therein shall ever be exchanged, transferred, remitted, released, postponed or in any way diminished except as may be prescribed by the legislature. The liability or obligation shall not be extinguished except by payment into the proper treasury or as may otherwise be prescribed by the legislature in cases where the obligation or liability is not collectible. (As amended by Laws 1983, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 961.)

Cross references. —

As to public indebtedness generally, see art. 16, §§ 1 to 13, Wyo. Const.

Purpose of this section

is to prevent discrimination by the favoring of one class of taxpayer or debtor of a governmental unit as against another and to further prevent waste or dissipation of the assets of such governmental units. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Compromise and settlement of judgment in favor of state for inheritance taxes. —

A judgment in favor of the state for inheritance taxes is not definite and certain to the extent that a compromise and settlement may not be entered into therefor. State ex rel. Wilson v. Young, 44 Wyo. 6, 7 P.2d 216,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1932).

Provision that taxes not collected or enforced for 10 years shall be cancelled

does not violate constitutional prohibition against remitting, releasing or diminishing obligations or liabilities owned by state or municipality. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Statute of limitation did not apply where self-reporting process was tainted. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's ruling, which changed the allocation of the company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county was not reversible based on Wyo. Const. art. Art. III, § 40 because Wyoming's ad valorem tax system was a self-reporting system, and where the self-reporting process was tainted, statutes of limitations could not be called into play. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Sale by drainage district of lands acquired by tax sale. —

This section does not prevent sale by drainage district of lands acquired by tax sale, for a sum less than the amount necessary to pay in full the amount due the state under its lien as holder of the district bonds, when the district court finds that the sale price is a fair value of the land, and sufficient to pay the principal and interest on bonded debt, but not the accrued statutory interest. Big Bend Drainage Dist. v. State, 50 Wyo. 242, 60 P.2d 815,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1936).

Effect of payment of dividend from insolvent estate. —

Payment of a dividend to the state or to a county from an insolvent estate cannot release the unpaid portion of the debt. State v. Foster, 5 Wyo. 199, 38 P. 926,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1895).

Priority as between liens. —

This section has no controlling effect in determining whether lien of state by reason of investment of permanent school funds in bonds issued by drainage district is inferior to lien of general taxes. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

There is no constitutional ban forbidding contingent fee arrangement contracts as such

if the statutory authorization of the legislature is sufficient. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Contingent fee arrangement for collection of accounts due. —

If a memorial hospital does not have sufficient means for collection of accounts due, it may rely upon a contingent fee arrangement and assign the accounts for collection by a collection service without constitutional violation. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Contingent fee contract held invalid. —

Contract whereby land commissioners hired auditors to investigate debts due state under mineral leases on contingent basis on amount recovered was invalid in its entirety because constitution requires moneys collected under contract to be paid into state treasury and precludes it from being paid out except pursuant to legislative appropriation and duly issued warrant. MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1935).

Claim for case by state of insane person. —

Summary judgment dismissing state's claim against estate of insane decedent, rendered in compliance with the nonclaim statute, now § 2-7-703(a), failed to violate this section, because no debt due the state had yet been ascertained. State ex rel. Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 363 P.2d 791,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 41. Resolutions; approval or veto.

Every order, resolution or vote, in which the concurrence of both houses may be necessary, except on the question of adjournment, or relating solely to the transaction of the business of the two houses, shall be presented to the governor, and before it shall take effect be approved by him, or, being disapproved, be repassed by two-thirds of both houses as prescribed in the case of a bill.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to the electors of the state of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors.

The proposed amendment provided that amendments to the Wyoming Constitution proposed by the legislature would be submitted to the electors of the state of Wyoming without prior approval by the governor. The amendment was not ratified by a majority of electors at the November 5, 2002 general election.

Legislative measures must be presented to governor. —

When art. 3, § 41, Wyo. Const. and art. 20, § 1, Wyo. Const., are read together, it is plainly declared that legislative measures, however denominated, which propose an amendment to the constitution, must be presented to the governor for approval or disapproval; thus, a measure proposing an amendment to the constitution must be presented to the governor for approval or disapproval. Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

See article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 42. Bribery of legislators and solicitation of bribery defined; expulsion of legislator for bribery or solicitation.

If any person elected to either house of the legislature shall offer or promise to give his vote or influence in favor of or against any measure or proposition, pending or to be introduced into the legislature, in consideration or upon condition that any other person elected to the same legislature will give, or promise or assent to give his vote or influence in favor of or against any other measure or proposition pending or proposed to be introduced into such legislature, the person making such offer or promise shall be deemed guilty of solicitation of bribery. If any member of the legislature shall give his vote or influence for or against any measure or proposition pending or to be introduced in such legislature, or offer, promise or assent thereto, upon condition that any other member will give or will promise or assent to give his vote or influence in favor of or against any other measure or proposition pending or to be introduced in such legislature, or in consideration that any other member has given his vote or influence for or against any other measure or proposition in such legislature, he shall be deemed guilty of bribery, and any member of the legislature, or person elected thereto, who shall be guilty of either of such offenses, shall be expelled and shall not thereafter be eligible to the legislature, and on conviction thereof in the civil courts shall be liable to such further penalty as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to bribery of or by governor, see art. 4, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to crime of bribery generally, see §§

6-5-101

,

6-5-102

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 43. Offers to bribe.

Any person who shall directly or indirectly offer, give or promise any money or thing of value, testimonial, privilege or personal advantage, to any executive or judicial officer or member of the legislature, to influence him in the performance of any of his official duties shall be deemed guilty of bribery, and be punished in such manner as shall be provided by law.

Cross references. —

As to bribery of or by governor, see art. 4, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to crime of bribery generally, see §§

6-5-101

,

6-5-102

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 44. Witnesses in bribery charges.

Any person may be compelled to testify in any lawful investigation or judicial proceeding against any person who may be charged with having committed the offense of bribery or corrupt solicitation, or practices of solicitation, and shall not be permitted to withhold his testimony upon the ground that it may criminate [incriminate] himself, or subject him to public infamy; but such testimony shall not afterwards be used against him in any judicial proceeding, except for perjury in giving such testimony, and any person convicted of either of the offenses aforesaid shall, as part of the punishment therefor, be disqualified from holding any office or position of honor, trust or profit in this state.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Immunity and the Grand Jury,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1973).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 45. Legislature shall define corrupt solicitation.

The offense of corrupt solicitation of members of the legislature or of public officers of the state, or of any municipal division thereof, and the occupation or practice of solicitation of such members or officers to influence their official actions shall be defined by law and shall be punishable by fine and imprisonment.

Cross references. —

As to bribery of public officer, see §

6-5-102

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 46. Interested member shall not vote.

A member who has a personal or private interest in any measure or bill proposed or pending before the legislature shall disclose the fact to the house of which he is a member, and shall not vote thereon.

Apportionment

§ 47. Congressional representation.

One representative in the congress of the United States shall be elected from the state at large, the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November, 1890, and thereafter at such times and places, and in such manner as may be prescribed by law. When a new apportionment shall be made by congress, the legislature shall divide the state into congressional districts accordingly.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of constitutional “compactness requirement” to redistricting, 114 ALR5th 311.

State court jurisdiction over congressional redistricting disputes, 114 ALR5th 387.

§ 48. State census.

At the first budget session of the legislature following the federal census, the legislature shall reapportion its membership based upon that census. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any bill to apportion the legislature may be introduced in a budget session in the same manner as in a general session. (As amended by Laws 1965, House Joint Resolution No. 2. p. 520; as amended by Laws 1997, House Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1.)

This section must be read in the light of and construed with § 3 of this article.

State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

Apportionment among counties required. —

Both § 3 of this article, and this section require the legislature to be “apportioned” among the counties. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

And apportionment provisions are mandatory. —

The provisions of the constitution are quite clear, explicit and mandatory. They leave no room for confusion or doubt as to what the legislature is to do about reapportionment and when it is to do it. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

Quoted

in

Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908); Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Possible Action to Force the Wyoming Legislature to Reapportion,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 136.

For note, “Wyoming Legislative Reapportionment in the Light (?) of Baker v. Carr,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 23 (1963).

§ 49. District representation.

Congressional districts may be altered from time to time as public convenience may require. When a congressional district shall be composed of two or more counties they shall be contiguous, and the districts as compact as may be. No county shall be divided in the formation of congressional districts. (As amended by Laws 1965, House Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 521.)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of constitutional “compactness requirement” to redistricting, 114 ALR5th 311.

State court jurisdiction over congressional redistricting disputes, 114 ALR5th 387.

§ 50. Apportionment for first legislature.

Until an apportionment of senators and representatives as otherwise provided by law, they shall be divided among the several counties of the state in the following manner:

Albany County, two senators and five representatives.

Carbon County, two senators and five representatives.

Converse County, one senator and three representatives.

Crook County, one senator and two representatives.

Fremont County, one senator and two representatives.

Laramie County, three senators and six representatives.

Johnson County, one senator and two representatives.

Sheridan County, one senator and two representatives.

Sweetwater County, two senators and three representatives.

Uinta County, two senators and three representatives.

Cross references. —

As to current apportionment, see §§

28-2-116

to

28-2-119

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908); Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

§ 51. Filling of vacancies.

When vacancies shall occur in the membership of either house of the legislature of the State of Wyoming through death, resignation or other cause, such vacancies shall be filled in such manner as may be prescribed by law, notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of article III of the constitution which is by this section repealed. (As added by Laws 1947, House Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 249.)

Cross references. —

As to when governor may fill vacancies in office, see art. 4, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to vacancies in elective state offices, see §

22-18-111

.

Section added. —

This section was added by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1947, House Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 249, adopted by a vote of the people at the general election held November 2, 1948, and proclaimed in effect December 1, 1948.

Initiative and Referendum

§ 52. Initiative and referendum.

The people may propose and enact laws by the initiative, and approve or reject acts of the legislature by the referendum.

An initiative or referendum is proposed by an application containing the bill to be initiated or the act to be referred. The application shall be signed by not less than one hundred (100) qualified voters as sponsors, and shall be filed with the secretary of state. If he finds it in proper form he shall so certify. Denial of certification shall be subject to judicial review.

After certification of the application, a petition containing a summary of the subject matter shall be prepared by the secretary of state for circulation by the sponsors. The petition may be filed with the secretary of state if it meets both of the following requirements:

It is signed by qualified voters, equal in number to fifteen per cent (15%) of those who voted in the preceding general election; and

It is signed by qualified voters equal in number to fifteen percent (15%) of those resident in at least two-thirds (2/3) of the counties of the state, as determined by those who voted in the preceding general election in that county.

An initiative petition may be filed at any time except that one may not be filed for a measure substantially the same as that defeated by an initiative election within the preceding (5) years. The secretary of state shall prepare a ballot title and proposition summarizing the proposed law, and shall place them on the ballot for the first statewide election held more than one hundred twenty (120) days after adjournment of the legislative session following the filing. If, before the election, substantially the same measure has been enacted, the petition is void.

A referendum petition may be filed only within ninety (90) days after adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed, except that a referendum petition respecting any act previously passed by the legislature may be filed within six months after the power of referendum is adopted. The secretary of state shall prepare a ballot title and proposition summarizing the act and shall place them on the ballot for the first statewide election held more than one hundred eighty (180) days after adjournment of that session.

If votes in an amount in excess of fifty percent (50%) of those voting in the general election are cast in favor of adoption of an initiated measure, the measure is enacted. If votes in an amount in excess of fifty percent (50%) of those voted in the general election are cast in favor of rejection of an act referred, it is rejected. The secretary of state shall certify the election returns. An initiated law becomes effective ninety (90) days after certification, is not subject to veto, and may not be repealed by the legislature within two (2) years of its effective date. It may be amended at any time. An act rejected by referendum is void thirty (30) days after certification. Additional procedures for the initiative and referendum may be prescribed by law.

The initiative shall not be used to dedicate revenues, make or repeal appropriations, create courts, define the jurisdiction of courts or prescribe their rules, enact local or special legislation, or enact that prohibited by the constitution for enactment by the legislature. The referendum shall not be applied to dedications of revenue, to appropriations, to local or special legislation, or to laws necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety. (As added by Laws 1967, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 729; as amended by Laws 1985, House Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 550; as amended by Laws 1997, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1.)

Cross references. —

See also §§

22-24-101

to

22-24-125

.

Editor's notes. —

Joint Resolution 1, 2008 Budget Session,
proposed to amend the Wyoming Constitution to modify the signature requirement for a petition for an initiative or referendum, under Wy. Const. Art. 3, § 52(c)(ii). The passage of this amendment would have changed the requirement for petition signatures for an initiative or referendum from at least fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified voters in at least two thirds (2/3) of the counties, as determined by those who voted in the last general election, to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified voters in at least two-thirds (2/3) of the senate districts, as determined by those who voted in the last general election .At the election of November 4, 2008, the proposed amendment did not meet the requirement of approval from a majority of the total ballots cast.

“Qualified voter” and “qualified registered voter” synonymous. —

The term “qualified voter,” required by subsection (c) to sign an initiative petition, is synonymous with the term “qualified registered voter,” required, pursuant to § 22-24-116(a)(i), to be counted as a valid signature on an initiative petition by the secretary of state. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Standard for foreclosing initiative from vote of people. —

An initiative, attacked as facially unconstitutional, must be unconstitutional in toto before foreclosing its inclusion in the ballot for a vote of the people. Wyoming Nat'l Abortion Rights Action League v. Karpan, 881 P.2d 281,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1994).

Secretary of state not to adopt rules implementing initiative and referendum. —

Since the constitutional provisions for initiative and referendum, coupled with applicable statutes, are considered self-executing, and, thereby, require no act of implementation, neither this section nor title 22, ch. 24 authorizes the secretary of state to adopt rules to implement procedures relative to initiative and referendum. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Term limit statute unconstitutional. —

Term limit law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

, as it applies to candidates for the state legislature, whether adopted by initiative or legislative action, is unconstitutional and unenforceable because it violates art. 1, § 3 and art. 3, §§ 2 and 52(g), Wyo. Const. No law, whether enacted by the legislature through the legislative process or by the people through the initiative process, may condition political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition such as incumbency. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

For case note, “Administrative Law — Initiative and Referendum. Initiative Petitions in Wyoming — The Presumption of Validity and the Secretary of State's Review. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778, 1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387 (Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 857 (1983).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

§ 53. Creation of criminal penalties not subject to governor's power to commute.

Notwithstanding Article 4, Section 5 of this Constitution, the legislature may by law create a penalty of life imprisonment without parole for specified crimes which sentence shall not be subject to commutation by the governor. The legislature may in addition limit commutation of a death sentence to a sentence of life imprisonment without parole which sentence shall not be subject to further commutation. In no event shall the inherent power of the governor to grant a pardon be limited or curtailed. (Added by 1993 Senate JR 4, ratified in 1994.)

Cross references. —

As to commutation of a death sentence once it has been commuted to a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, see §

7-13-807

.

Quoted

in

Booth v. State, 2008 WY 3, 174 P.3d 171,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan. 10, 2008).

Editor's notes. —

In the original constitution the sections under the heading “Apportionment” were numbered 1, 2, 3 and 4, but to avoid confusion in making references, these sections have been renumbered 47, 48, 49 and 50 so as to make the section numbers of this article run consecutively.